Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5187.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 28-7-2, 28-7-3, 28-7-9, 28-7-21 and 28-7-22 of the General Laws in
Chapter 28-7 entitled "Labor Relations Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
28-7-2. Policy of chapter.
(a) The economic necessity for employees to possess full freedom of association, actual
liberty of contract, and bargaining power equal to that of their employers, who are frequently
organized in corporate or other forms of association, has long been sanctioned by public opinion,
and recognized and affirmed by legislatures and the highest courts. As the modern industrial system
has progressed, there has developed between and among employees and employers an ever greater
economic interdependence and community of interest which have become matters of vital public
concern. Employers and employees have recognized that the peaceable practice and wholesome
development of that relationship and interest are materially aided by the general adoption and
advancement of the procedure and practice of bargaining collectively as between equals. It is in the
public interest that equality of bargaining power be established and maintained. It is likewise
recognized that the denial by some employers of the right of employees freely to organize and the
resultant refusal to accept the procedure of collective bargaining substantially and adversely affect
the interest of employees, other employers, and the public in general. This denial creates variations
and instability in competitive wage rates and working conditions within and between industries and
between employees and employers engaged in those industries, and by depressing the purchasing
power of wage earners and the profits of business, tends to:

(1) Produce and aggravate recurrent business depressions;
(2) Increase the disparity between production and consumption;
(3) Create unemployment with its attendant dangers to the health, peace and morale of the
people; and
(4) Increase public and private expenditures for relief of the needy and the unemployed.
(b) When some employers deny the right of employees to full freedom of association and
organization, and refuse to recognize the practice and procedure of collective bargaining, their
actions lead to strikes, lockouts, and other forms of industrial strife and unrest which are inimical
to the public safety and welfare, and frequently endanger the public health.
(c) Experience has proved that protection by law of the right of employees to organize and
bargain collectively removes certain recognized sources of industrial strife and unrest, encourages
practices fundamental to the friendly adjustment of industrial disputes arising out of differences as
to wages, hours, or other working conditions, and tends to restore equality of bargaining power
between and among employers and employees, thereby advancing the interests of employers as
well as employees.
(d) In the interpretation and application of this chapter and otherwise, it is declared to be
the public policy of the state to encourage the practice and procedure of collective bargaining, and
to protect employees, when not already protected by the National Labor Relations Board, 29 U.S.C.
§§151-169 in the exercise of full freedom of association, self organization, and designation of
representatives of their own choosing for the purposes of collective bargaining, or other mutual aid
and protection, free from the interference, restraint, or coercion of their employers.
(e) All the provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed for the accomplishment of
this purpose.
(f) This chapter shall be deemed an exercise of the police power of the state for the
protection of the public welfare, prosperity, health, and peace of the people of the state.
28-7-3. Definitions.
When used in this chapter:
(1) “Board” means the labor relations board created by § 28-7-4.
(2) “Company union” means any committee employee representation plan or association
of employees that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning
grievances or terms and conditions of employment, that the employer has initiated or created or
whose initiation or creation he or she has suggested, participated in or in the formulation of whose
governing rules or policies or the conducting of whose management, operations, or elections the
employer participates in or supervises, or which the employer maintains, finances, controls,
LC000633/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 7

dominates, or assists in maintaining or financing, whether by compensating any one for services
performed in its behalf or by donating free services, equipment, materials, office or meeting space
or anything else of value, or by any other means.
(3)(i) “Employees” includes, but is not restricted to, any individual employed by a labor
organization; any individual whose employment has ceased as a consequence of, or in connection
with, any current labor dispute or because of any unfair labor practice, and who has not obtained
any other regular and substantially equivalent employment; and shall not be limited to the
employees of a particular employer, unless the chapter explicitly states otherwise;
(ii) “Employees” does not include any individual employed by his or her parent or spouse
or in the domestic service of any person in his or her home, or any individuals employed only for
the duration of a labor dispute, or any individuals employed as farm laborers; provided that, any
individual employed by an employer in an industry established or regulated pursuant to chapters
28.6 or 28.11 of title 21 shall be an employee within the meaning of this chapter and shall not be
considered a farm laborer.;
(iii) "Employee" specifically includes any teaching assistants, research assistants, fellows,
residential assistants and proctors who perform services for an employer in return for payment or
other compensation, notwithstanding whether the employee is a student, or the supervised teaching,
research, or other services are a component of their academic development.
(4) “Employer” includes any person acting on behalf of or in the interest of an employer,
directly or indirectly, with or without his or her knowledge, but a labor organization or any officer
or its agent shall only be considered an employer with respect to individuals employed by the
organization.
(5) “Labor dispute” includes, but is not restricted to, any controversy between employers
and employees or their representatives as defined in this section concerning terms, tenure, or
conditions of employment or concerning the association or representation of persons in negotiating,
fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to negotiate, fix, maintain, or change terms or conditions
of employment, or concerning the violation of any of the rights granted or affirmed by this chapter,
regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate relation of employer and employee.
(6) “Labor organization” means any organization that exists and is constituted for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining, or of dealing with employers concerning
grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or of other mutual aid or protection and which is
not a company union as defined in this section.
(7) “Person” includes one or more individuals, partnerships, associations, corporations,
legal representatives, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, or receivers.
LC000633/SUB A/2 - Page 3 of 7

(8) “Policies of this chapter” means the policies set forth in § 28-7-2.
(9) “Representatives” includes a labor organization or an individual whether or not
employed by the employer of those whom he or she represents.
(10) “Unfair labor practice” means only those unfair labor practices listed in §§ 28-7-13
and 28-7-13.1.
28-7-9. Rules and regulations.
(a) The board shall have authority from time to time to make, amend, and rescind any rules
and regulations that may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter including the
determination of the life of the selected representatives. The rules and regulations shall be effective
upon publication in the manner that the board prescribes.
(b) The rules and regulations for state and municipal employees shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(1) The board shall require a labor organization to submit cards of interest signed by at
least thirty percent (30%) of the employees in the appropriate bargaining unit indicating a desire to
be represented by the labor organization so designated. Cards of interest signed by at least twenty
percent (20%) of the employees in the appropriate bargaining unit shall be required to intervene.
The board shall certify the authenticity of all cards of interest submitted.
(2) The board shall not consider a petition for representation whenever it appears that a
collective bargaining agreement is in existence; provided, that the board may consider a petition
within a thirty-day (30) period immediately preceding sixty (60) days prior to the expiration date
of the collective bargaining agreement.
(3) A petition for unit clarification may be filed at any time with the board by:
(i) An exclusive bargaining agent;
(ii) The applicable municipality; or
(iii) The state where appropriate.
(4) In addition to the provisions of § 28-7-22, the board is empowered to order complete
relief upon a finding of any unfair labor practice.
(5) All charges of unfair labor practices and petitions for unit classification shall be
informally heard by the board within thirty (30) days upon receipt of the charges or petitions.
Within sixty (60) days of the charges or petition the board shall hold a formal hearing. A final
decision shall be rendered by the board within sixty (60) days after the hearing on the charges or
petition is completed and a transcript of the hearing is received by the board.
(6) The board shall establish standards for deferring a pending unfair labor practice charge
to allow for the grievance and arbitration process to move forward pursuant to the charging parties’
LC000633/SUB A/2 - Page 4 of 7

collective bargaining agreement.
(c) Insofar as the provisions of this section are inconsistent with the provisions of chapter
11 of title 36 and chapter 9.4 of this title, the provisions of this section are controlling.
(d) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prevent or limit the board or its
agents by direction of the board, consistent with published rules and regulations, from dismissing,
after investigation and informal hearings, the unfair labor practices charge. All unit classification
petitions shall receive a formal hearing if requested by either party. The board or its agents shall
maintain a written record of any dismissals.
(e) The board shall promulgate the appropriate rules and regulations allowing for the
electronic filing of cards of interest, decertification signature cards, signature affirmation
documents, and designation of bargaining agent and waiver of right-to-vote forms.
28-7-21. Complaints of unfair practices — Parties to proceedings — Rules of
evidence.
(a) Whenever a charge has been made that any employer or public sector employee
organization, as provided in § 28-7-13.1, has engaged in or is engaging in any unfair labor practice,
the board shall have the power to issue and cause to be served upon the party a complaint stating
those charges in that respect and containing a notice of a hearing before the board at a place fixed
in the complaint, to be held not less than seven (7) days after the serving of the complaint. Any
complaint may be amended by the board or its agent conducting the hearing at any time prior to the
issuance of an order based on the complaint. The person complained of shall have the right to file
an answer to the original or amended complaint within five (5) days after the service of the original
or amended complaint and to appear in person or otherwise to give testimony at the place and time
set in the complaint. In the discretion of a member or agent conducting the hearing, or of the board,
any other person may be allowed to intervene in the proceedings and to present testimony. In any
proceeding the board or its agent is not bound by technical rules of evidence prevailing in the courts.
(b) The board shall have jurisdiction to issue a complaint and make a ruling on any unfair
labor practice charge, notwithstanding a pending grievance on the same or similar issue.
28-7-22. Testimony at hearing — Decision and orders.
(a) The testimony shall be taken at the hearing and the board in its discretion may upon
notice take further testimony or hear argument. The testimony so taken or heard shall not be reduced
to writing unless an appeal is taken as provided in this chapter by an aggrieved party or unless a
transcript is required for proceedings in the superior court.
(b)(1) If upon all the testimony taken the board determines that the respondent has engaged
in or is engaging in any unfair labor practice, the board shall state its findings of fact and shall issue
LC000633/SUB A/2 - Page 5 of 7

and cause to be served on the respondent an order requiring the respondent to cease and desist from
the unfair labor practice, and to take any further affirmative or other action that will effectuate the
policies of this chapter, including, but not limited to:
(i) Withdrawal of recognition from and refraining from bargaining collectively with any
employee organization or association, agency, or plan defined in this chapter as a company union,
or established, maintained, or assisted by any action defined in this chapter as an unfair labor
practice;
(ii) Awarding of back pay;
(iii) Reinstatement with or without back pay of any employee discriminated against in
violation of § 28-7-13, or maintenance of a preferential list from which the employee shall be
returned to work; and
(iv) Reinstatement with or without back pay of all employees whose work has ceased or
whose return to work has been delayed or prevented as the result of the aforementioned or any other
unfair labor practice in respect to any employee or employees or maintenance of a preferential list
from which the employees shall be returned to work.
(2) The order may further require the person to make file reports from time to time, showing
the extent to which the order has been complied with.
(c) If upon all the testimony the board is of the opinion that the person or persons named
in the complaint have not engaged in or are not engaging in any unfair labor practice, the board
shall make its findings of fact and issue an order dismissing the complaint.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000633/SUB A/2
========
LC000633/SUB A/2 - Page 6 of 7